src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-jegaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Pronoun - jegā: # pronouns 2 'eng each /est iga /fin joka' - full paradigm
     jegā+Pron+Sg+Nom: jegā
     jegā+Pron+Sg+Gen: jegā
     jegā+Pron+Sg+Par: jegā
     jegā+Pron+Sg+Dat: jegān
     jegā+Pron+Sg+Ins: jegāks
     jegā+Pron+Sg+Ill: jeʼggõ
     jegā+Pron+Sg+Ela: jegāst
